Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.090

Certificates of indebtedness—Issued, when—Retirement.

The state finance committee may issue certificates of indebtedness in such sum or sums that may be necessary to meet temporary deficiencies of the treasury. Such certificates may be issued only to provide for the appropriations already made by the legislature and such certificates must be retired and the debt discharged other than by refunding within twelve months after the date of issuance.

For the purposes of this section, the state treasury shall include all statutorily established funds and accounts except for any of the permanent funds of the state treasury.

[ 2007 c 215 s 3; 1985 c 57 s 21; 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Contingent effective date—2007 c 215: See notes following RCW 39.42.070.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.